Hawaii statutes.
§201H-44 Commercial, industrial, and other
uses. (a) In connection with the development of any dwelling units under
this chapter, the corporation may also develop commercial, industrial, and
other properties if it determines that the uses can be an integral part of the
development or can help to enhance the lifestyles of residents of the
development. The corporation may designate any portions of the development for
commercial, industrial, or other use and shall have all the powers granted
under this chapter with respect thereto, including the power to bypass
statutes, ordinances, charter provisions, and rules of any government agency
pursuant to section 201H-38. For this purpose, the corporation may use any of
the funds authorized under this chapter.

(b) The corporation shall adopt rules that
shall provide the manner in which the uses of properties shall be designated,
and shall provide that any commercial, industrial, or other properties so
developed shall be sold or leased at cost or at economic rents or sales
prices. The net proceeds of all such sales or leases, less costs to the
corporation, shall be deposited in the dwelling unit revolving fund.

The rules may also provide that during the
first twenty years after its purchase, any commercial, industrial, or other
property so developed and sold may be resold or assigned only to the
corporation at the original purchase price plus the cost of any improvements
made by the purchaser together with simple interest on all of the purchaser's
equity in the property at the rate of seven per cent a year. [L 2006, c 180, pt
of §3; am L 2016, c 131, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next